Idaho, session 2026, H0876.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Idaho:
SECTION 1. There is hereby appropriated to the State Board of Educa-
tion the following amounts to be expended according to the designated pro-
grams and expense classes from the listed funds for the period July 1, 2026,
through June 30, 2027:


FOR
FOR FOR FOR TRUSTEE AND
PERSONNEL OPERATING CAPITAL BENEFIT
COSTS EXPENDITURES OUTLAY PAYMENTS TOTAL
I. AGRICULTURAL RESEARCH & EXTENSION SERVICE:
FROM:
General
Fund $34,260,400 $3,752,900 $650,000 $38,663,300
II. COLLEGE AND UNIVERSITIES:
A. BOISE STATE UNIVERSITY:
FROM:
General
Fund $120,957,500 $7,123,000 $3,441,400 $131,521,900
Unrestricted
Fund 124,742,500 49,314,700 2,000,000 176,057,200
TOTAL $245,700,000 $56,437,700 $5,441,400 $307,579,100
B. IDAHO STATE UNIVERSITY:
FROM:
General
Fund $99,201,600 $2,228,000 $27,700 $101,457,300
Charitable Institutions Endowment Income
Fund 2,050,500 2,050,500
Normal School Endowment Income
Fund 3,987,300 3,987,300
Unrestricted
Fund 38,199,200 26,735,700 4,074,800 69,009,700
TOTAL $143,438,600 $28,963,700 $4,102,500 $176,504,800
C. LEWIS-CLARK STATE COLLEGE:
FROM:
General
Fund $20,350,700 $2,550,300 $425,300 $23,326,300
Normal School Endowment Income
Fund 3,891,600 3,891,600
Unrestricted
Fund 15,032,500 2,150,200 23,800 17,206,500
TOTAL $35,383,200 $8,592,100 $449,100 $44,424,400


FOR
FOR FOR FOR TRUSTEE AND
PERSONNEL OPERATING CAPITAL BENEFIT
COSTS EXPENDITURES OUTLAY PAYMENTS TOTAL
D. UNIVERSITY OF IDAHO:
FROM:
General
Fund $101,679,300 $6,817,000 $3,386,800 $111,883,100
Agricultural College Endowment Income
Fund 940,100 915,400 246,900 2,102,400
Scientific School Endowment Income
Fund 3,468,500 3,616,300 7,084,800
University Endowment Income
Fund 5,894,200 680,600 6,574,800
Unrestricted
Fund 55,507,800 25,085,500 101,600 80,694,900
TOTAL $161,595,700 $42,328,400 $4,415,900 $208,340,000
E. SYSTEMWIDE PROGRAMS:
FROM:
General
Fund $283,800 $3,155,000 $3,695,100 $7,133,900
DIVISION
TOTAL $586,401,300 $139,476,900 $14,408,900 $3,695,100 $743,982,200
III. COMMUNITY COLLEGES:
A. COLLEGE OF EASTERN IDAHO:
FROM:
General
Fund $8,049,700 $26,700 $8,076,400
Community College
Fund 200,000 0 200,000
TOTAL $8,249,700 $26,700 $8,276,400
B. COLLEGE OF SOUTHERN IDAHO:
FROM:
General
Fund $18,881,000 $1,621,300 $20,502,300


FOR
FOR FOR FOR TRUSTEE AND
PERSONNEL OPERATING CAPITAL BENEFIT
COSTS EXPENDITURES OUTLAY PAYMENTS TOTAL
Community College
Fund 0 200,000 200,000
TOTAL $18,881,000 $1,821,300 $20,702,300
C. COLLEGE OF WESTERN IDAHO:
FROM:
General
Fund $19,599,800 $2,332,000 $21,931,800
Community College
Fund 0 200,000 200,000
TOTAL $19,599,800 $2,532,000 $22,131,800
D. NORTH IDAHO COLLEGE:
FROM:
General
Fund $13,821,600 $1,876,800 $15,698,400
Community College
Fund 0 175,000 $25,000 200,000
TOTAL $13,821,600 $2,051,800 $25,000 $15,898,400
E. CC SYSTEMWIDE:
FROM:
General
Fund $37,200 $37,200
DIVISION
TOTAL $60,552,100 $6,469,000 $25,000 $67,046,100
IV. OFFICE OF THE STATE BOARD OF EDUCATION:
A. OSBE ADMINISTRATION:
FROM:
General
Fund $5,743,900 $2,192,500 $7,936,400
Indirect Cost Recovery
Fund 40,900 83,900 124,800
In-Demand Careers
Fund 282,400 12,000 294,400


FOR
FOR FOR FOR TRUSTEE AND
PERSONNEL OPERATING CAPITAL BENEFIT
COSTS EXPENDITURES OUTLAY PAYMENTS TOTAL
Miscellaneous Revenue
Fund 176,300 168,300 $6,125,000 $100,000 6,569,600
TOTAL $6,243,500 $2,456,700 $6,125,000 $100,000 $14,925,200
B. IT AND DATA MANAGEMENT:
FROM:
General
Fund $3,543,100 $1,109,500 $3,430,000 $8,082,600
Broadband Infrastructure
Fund 1,274,000 1,274,000
Public Instruction
Fund 0 15,000 0 15,000
TOTAL $3,543,100 $1,124,500 $4,704,000 $9,371,600
C. SCHOOL SAFETY AND SECURITY PROGRAM:
FROM:
General
Fund $591,700 $152,200 $743,900
Miscellaneous Revenue/School Security Assessment
Fund 300,900 66,000 366,900
TOTAL $892,600 $218,200 $1,110,800
DIVISION
TOTAL $10,679,200 $3,799,400 $6,125,000 $4,804,000 $25,407,600
V. HEALTH EDUCATION PROGRAMS:
A. BOISE INTERNAL MEDICINE:
FROM:
General
Fund $1,252,300 $1,252,300
B. EASTERN IDAHO MED RESIDENCIES:
FROM:
General
Fund $3,147,600 $3,147,600


FOR
FOR FOR FOR TRUSTEE AND
PERSONNEL OPERATING CAPITAL BENEFIT
COSTS EXPENDITURES OUTLAY PAYMENTS TOTAL
C. FAMILY MEDICINE RESIDENCIES:
FROM:
General
Fund $3,017,900 $222,900 $4,733,600 $7,974,400
D. IDAHO DENTAL EDUCATION PROGRAM:
FROM:
General
Fund $216,100 $1,811,200 $2,027,300
Unrestricted
Fund 256,000 $60,500 $5,500 0 322,000
TOTAL $472,100 $60,500 $5,500 $1,811,200 $2,349,300
E. PSYCHIATRY EDUCATION:
FROM:
General
Fund $812,700 $812,700
F. UNIVERSITY OF UTAH MEDICAL EDUCATION:
FROM:
General
Fund $3,148,800 $3,148,800
G. WIMU VETERINARY EDUCATION:
FROM:
General
Fund $742,100 $2,020,600 $2,762,700
Restricted
Fund 0 0 $100,000 100,000
TOTAL $742,100 $2,020,600 $100,000 $2,862,700


FOR
FOR FOR FOR TRUSTEE AND
PERSONNEL OPERATING CAPITAL BENEFIT
COSTS EXPENDITURES OUTLAY PAYMENTS TOTAL
H. WWAMI MEDICAL EDUCATION:
FROM:
General
Fund $1,690,200 $347,800 $5,737,100 $7,775,100
DIVISION
TOTAL $5,922,300 $2,651,800 $5,500 $20,743,300 $29,322,900
VI. DIVISION OF CAREER TECHNICAL EDUCATION:
A. CTE ADMINISTRATION:
FROM:
General
Fund $2,328,800 $618,300 $2,947,100
Federal Grant
Fund 0 20,000 20,000
TOTAL $2,328,800 $638,300 $2,967,100
B. SECONDARY AND GENERAL PROGRAMS:
FROM:
General
Fund $1,320,000 $239,200 $14,110,300 $15,669,500
In-Demand Careers
Fund 5,000,000 5,000,000
Miscellaneous Revenue
Fund 25,000 25,000
Federal Grant
Fund 833,300 277,800 3,345,800 4,456,900
TOTAL $2,153,300 $542,000 $22,456,100 $25,151,400
C. POSTSECONDARY PROGRAMS:
FROM:
General
Fund $51,319,000 $5,044,300 $9,120,300 $65,483,600
Federal Grant
Fund 0 0 4,368,400 4,368,400
TOTAL $51,319,000 $5,044,300 $13,488,700 $69,852,000


FOR
FOR FOR FOR TRUSTEE AND
PERSONNEL OPERATING CAPITAL BENEFIT
COSTS EXPENDITURES OUTLAY PAYMENTS TOTAL
D. EDUCATOR SERVICES PROGRAM:
FROM:
General
Fund $811,400 $194,100 $661,200 $1,666,700
Miscellaneous Revenue
Fund 0 275,000 0 275,000
TOTAL $811,400 $469,100 $661,200 $1,941,700
E. RELATED PROGRAMS:
FROM:
General
Fund $936,400 $167,500 $2,027,300 $3,131,200
Displaced Homemaker
Fund 170,000 170,000
Hazardous Materials/Waste Enforcement
Fund 67,800 67,800
Miscellaneous Revenue
Fund 15,000 15,000
Federal Grant
Fund 250,200 94,300 3,067,900 3,412,400
TOTAL $1,186,600 $276,800 $5,333,000 $6,796,400
DIVISION
TOTAL $57,799,100 $6,970,500 $41,939,000 $106,708,600
VII. IDAHO PUBLIC TELEVISION:
FROM:
General
Fund $1,680,200 $990,900 $300,900 $2,972,000
Idaho Millennium Income
Fund 207,000 800,000 0 1,007,000
TOTAL $1,887,200 $1,790,900 $300,900 $3,979,000


FOR
FOR FOR FOR TRUSTEE AND
PERSONNEL OPERATING CAPITAL BENEFIT
COSTS EXPENDITURES OUTLAY PAYMENTS TOTAL
VIII. SPECIAL PROGRAMS:
A. FOREST UTILIZATION RESEARCH:
FROM:
General
Fund $1,502,300 $160,600 $1,662,900
B. GEOLOGICAL SURVEY:
FROM:
General
Fund $1,355,800 $700 $1,356,500
C. MUSEUM OF NATURAL HISTORY:
FROM:
General
Fund $763,900 $3,300 $767,200
D. SCHOLARSHIPS AND GRANTS:
FROM:
General
Fund $113,000 $24,898,000 $25,011,000
US Dept of Education Gearup Scholarship
Fund 25,400 $1,000 4,504,600 4,531,000
TOTAL $138,400 $1,000 $29,402,600 $29,542,000
E. SMALL BUSINESS DEVELOPMENT CENTERS:
FROM:
General
Fund $907,800 $907,800
American Rescue Plan
Fund 112,700 $110,200 222,900
TOTAL $1,020,500 $110,200 $1,130,700


FOR
FOR FOR FOR TRUSTEE AND
PERSONNEL OPERATING CAPITAL BENEFIT
COSTS EXPENDITURES OUTLAY PAYMENTS TOTAL
F. TECHHELP:
FROM:
General
Fund $444,500 $444,500
DIVISION
TOTAL $5,225,400 $275,800 $29,402,600 $34,903,800
IX. DEPARTMENT OF EDUCATION:
A. ADMINISTRATION:
FROM:
General
Fund $3,215,000 $828,000 $4,043,000
Indirect Cost Recovery
Fund 837,000 157,200 994,200
Public Instruction
Fund 606,800 231,400 838,200
Federal Grant
Fund 0 96,000 96,000
TOTAL $4,658,800 $1,312,600 $5,971,400
B. STUDENT SERVICES:
FROM:
General
Fund $3,161,900 $4,143,800 $269,600 $7,575,300
Indirect Cost Recovery
Fund 116,200 902,900 1,019,100
Driver's Training
Fund 223,200 302,900 2,113,300 2,639,400
Public Instruction
Fund 403,100 766,100 11,400 1,180,600
Miscellaneous Revenue
Fund 388,800 187,700 576,500
Public Schools Other Income
Fund 120,500 363,200 483,700
Cigarette, Tobacco and Lottery Income Taxes
Fund 121,100 121,100


FOR
FOR FOR FOR TRUSTEE AND
PERSONNEL OPERATING CAPITAL BENEFIT
COSTS EXPENDITURES OUTLAY PAYMENTS TOTAL
Idaho Millennium Income
Fund 54,500 6,450,000 6,504,500
School Bus Camera
Fund 6,800 6,800
Federal Grant
Fund 5,543,300 12,194,900 2,082,200 19,820,400
TOTAL $10,132,600 $18,861,500 $10,933,300 $39,927,400
DIVISION
TOTAL $14,791,400 $20,174,100 $10,933,300 $45,898,800
X. VOCATIONAL REHABILITATION:
A. VOCATIONAL REHABILITATION:
FROM:
General
Fund $2,664,800 $318,700 $55,500 $1,604,100 $4,643,100
Rehabilitation Revenue and Refunds
Fund 1,600 619,600 540,000 1,161,200
Miscellaneous Revenue
Fund 1,600 87,800 165,700 255,100
Federal Grant
Fund 10,643,200 1,430,600 349,100 7,729,700 20,152,600
TOTAL $13,311,200 $2,456,700 $404,600 $10,039,500 $26,212,000
B. COUNCIL FOR THE DEAF AND HARD OF HEARING:
FROM:
General
Fund $462,900 $135,000 $597,900
Miscellaneous Revenue
Fund 0 3,000 3,000
TOTAL $462,900 $138,000 $600,900
DIVISION
TOTAL $13,774,100 $2,594,700 $404,600 $10,039,500 $26,812,900


FOR
FOR FOR FOR TRUSTEE AND
PERSONNEL OPERATING CAPITAL BENEFIT
COSTS EXPENDITURES OUTLAY PAYMENTS TOTAL
XI. CHARTER SCHOOL COMMISSION:
FROM:
General
Fund $154,400 $38,200 $192,600
Public Charter School Authorizers
Fund 446,200 105,900 552,100
TOTAL $600,600 $144,100 $744,700
GRANDTOTAL $791,893,100 $188,100,100 $21,919,900 $121,556,800 $1,123,469,900
SECTION 2. FTP AUTHORIZATION FOR FISCAL YEAR 2027. In accordance with
Section 67-3519, Idaho Code, the programs listed below in the State Board
of Education are authorized no more than the following number of full-time
equivalent positions at any point during the period July 1, 2026, through
June 30, 2027, unless specifically authorized by the Governor. The Joint
Finance-Appropriations Committee will be notified promptly of any increased
positions so authorized. Full-time equivalent positions at the institu-
tions of higher education and postsecondary programs in the Division of
Career Technical Education are not limited.
Office of the State Board of Education ..........................84.42
WIMU Veterinary Education ......................................6.38
WWAMI Medical Education .......................................11.03
Idaho Dental Education Program .................................3.25
Family Medicine Residencies ...................................25.30
Division of Career Technical Education .........................58.00
Idaho Public Television .......................................15.00
Forest Utilization Research ...................................12.68
Geological Survey ............................................12.43
Museum of Natural History ......................................8.20
Scholarships and Grants ........................................1.35
Small Business Development Centers ............................11.17
TechHelp ......................................................3.44
Department of Education ......................................127.00
Division of Vocational Rehabilitation ........................144.37
Charter School Commission ......................................5.00
SECTION 3. EXEMPTIONS FROM EXPENSE CLASS TRANSFER LIMITATIONS --
AGRICULTURAL RESEARCH AND EXTENSION SERVICE. The State Board of Education
and the Board of Regents of the University of Idaho for the Agricultural
Research and Extension Service are hereby exempted from the provisions of
Section 67-3511(1) and (3), Idaho Code, allowing unlimited transfers be-
tween expense classes for all moneys appropriated to them for the period July


1, 2026, through June 30, 2027. Legislative appropriations shall not be
transferred from one fund to another fund unless expressly approved by the
Legislature.
SECTION 4. REAPPROPRIATION AUTHORITY FOR DEDICATED FUNDS -- COLLEGE
AND UNIVERSITIES. There is hereby reappropriated to the State Board of Ed-
ucation and the Board of Regents of the University of Idaho for College and
Universities and the Office of the State Board of Education any unexpended
and unencumbered balances appropriated or reappropriated to the State Board
of Education and the Board of Regents of the University of Idaho for College
and Universities from dedicated funds for fiscal year 2026, to be used for
nonrecurring expenditures for the period July 1, 2026, through June 30,
2027. The Office of the State Controller shall confirm the reappropriation
amount, by fund, expense class, and program, with the Legislative Services
Office prior to processing the reappropriation authorized herein.
SECTION 5. EXEMPTIONS FROM EXPENSE CLASS AND PROGRAM TRANSFER LIMITA-
TIONS -- COLLEGE AND UNIVERSITIES. The State Board of Education and the Board
of Regents of the University of Idaho for College and Universities and the
Office of the State Board of Education are hereby exempted from the provi-
sions of Section 67-3511(1), (2), and (3), Idaho Code, allowing unlimited
transfers between expense classes and between programs for all moneys appro-
priated to them for the period July 1, 2026, through June 30, 2027. Legisla-
tive appropriations shall not be transferred from one fund to another fund
unless expressly approved by the Legislature.
SECTION 6. SYSTEMWIDE NEEDS -- COLLEGE AND UNIVERSITIES. Of the amount
appropriated in Subsection II. E. of Section 1 of this act, the following
amounts may be used as follows:
(1) An amount not to exceed $902,600 may be used by the Office of
the State Board of Education for systemwide needs that benefit all of the
four-year institutions, including but not limited to projects to promote
accountability and information transfer throughout the higher education
system; and
(2) An amount of approximately $1,960,500 may be used for the mission
and goals of the Higher Education Research Council as outlined in State
Board of Education Policy III.W., which includes awards for infrastructure,
matching grants, and competitive grants through the Idaho Incubation Fund
program.
SECTION 7. STUDENT TUITION AND FEES FOR FISCAL YEAR 2027 -- COLLEGE AND
UNIVERSITIES. Notwithstanding the provisions of Section 67-3516(2), Idaho
Code, the Division of Financial Management may approve the expenditure of
dedicated state funds pursuant to the noncognizable process for student tu-
ition and fees during fiscal year 2027 for College and Universities. Each of
the institutions' budget requests for fiscal year 2028 shall reflect all ad-
justments so approved by the Division of Financial Management.
SECTION 8. VOLUNTARY SEPARATION OPTION -- COLLEGE AND UNIVERSITIES.
Notwithstanding the provisions of Section 67-5342, Idaho Code, or any other


provision of law, the college and universities may, at the discretion of the
college or university president, employ a voluntary separation incentive
plan as part of an overall financial and budget management strategy. Such
voluntary separation incentive plans shall not be considered severance for
the purposes of Section 67-5342, Idaho Code.
SECTION 9. EXEMPTIONS FROM EXPENSE CLASS AND PROGRAM TRANSFER LIMITA-
TIONS -- COMMUNITY COLLEGES. The State Board of Education for Community Col-
leges is hereby exempted from the provisions of Section 67-3511(1), (2), and
(3), Idaho Code, allowing unlimited transfers between expense classes and
between programs for all moneys appropriated to it for the period July 1,
2026, through June 30, 2027. Legislative appropriations shall not be trans-
ferred from one fund to another fund unless expressly approved by the Legis-
lature.
SECTION 10. EXEMPTIONS FROM EXPENSE CLASS TRANSFER LIMITATIONS --
HEALTH EDUCATION PROGRAMS. The State Board of Education and the Board of
Regents of the University of Idaho for Health Education Programs are hereby
exempted from the provisions of Section 67-3511(1) and (3), Idaho Code,
allowing unlimited transfers between expense classes for dedicated fund
moneys appropriated for the period July 1, 2026, through June 30, 2027. Leg-
islative appropriations shall not be transferred from one fund to another
fund unless expressly approved by the Legislature.
SECTION 11. REAPPROPRIATION AUTHORITY FOR DEDICATED FUNDS -- HEALTH
EDUCATION PROGRAMS. There is hereby reappropriated to the State Board of
Education and the Board of Regents of the University of Idaho for Health Ed-
ucation Programs any unexpended and unencumbered balances appropriated or
reappropriated to the State Board of Education and the Board of Regents of
the University of Idaho for Health Education Programs from dedicated funds
for fiscal year 2026 to be used for nonrecurring expenditures for the period
July 1, 2026, through June 30, 2027. The Office of the State Controller shall
confirm the reappropriation amount, by fund, expense class, and program,
with the Legislative Services Office prior to processing the reappropria-
tion authorized herein.
SECTION 12. STUDENT TUITION AND FEES FOR FISCAL YEAR 2027 -- HEALTH
EDUCATION PROGRAMS. Notwithstanding the provisions of Section 67-3516(2),
Idaho Code, the Division of Financial Management may approve the expenditure
of dedicated state funds pursuant to the noncognizable process for student
tuition and fees during fiscal year 2027 for Health Education Programs. Each
of the programs' budget requests for fiscal year 2028 shall reflect all ad-
justments so approved by the Division of Financial Management.
SECTION 13. EXEMPTIONS FROM EXPENSE CLASS TRANSFER LIMITATIONS -- DI-
VISION OF CAREER TECHNICAL EDUCATION. Postsecondary Programs within the Di-
vision of Career Technical Education is hereby exempted from the provisions
of Section 67-3511(1) and (3), Idaho Code, allowing unlimited transfers
between expense classes for all moneys appropriated to it for the period July
1, 2026, through June 30, 2027. Legislative appropriations shall not be


transferred from one fund to another fund unless expressly approved by the
Legislature.
SECTION 14. CONTINUOUS APPROPRIATION AUTHORITY -- IDAHO PUBLIC TELE-
VISION. Idaho Public Television is hereby granted continuous appropriation
authority for positions and funds from its Miscellaneous Revenue Fund for
the period July 1, 2026, through June 30, 2027, for the purpose of content
production and related services from revenue sources provided by private do-
nations.
SECTION 15. OPPORTUNITY SCHOLARSHIP PROGRAM ACCOUNT -- SPECIAL PRO-
GRAMS. Moneys appropriated from the General Fund to the Scholarships and
Grants Program for fiscal year 2026 that are unexpended and unencumbered on
June 30, 2026, are hereby appropriated and shall be transferred by the Office
of the State Controller to the Opportunity Scholarship Program Account cre-
ated in Section 33-4303, Idaho Code.
SECTION 16. REAPPROPRIATION AUTHORITY FOR THE IDAHO MILLENNIUM INCOME
FUND -- DEPARTMENT OF EDUCATION. There is hereby reappropriated to the State
Department of Education any unexpended and unencumbered balances appropri-
ated or reappropriated to the State Department of Education from the Idaho
Millennium Income Fund for fiscal year 2026 to be used for nonrecurring ex-
penditures for the period July 1, 2026, through June 30, 2027. The Office of
the State Controller shall confirm the reappropriation amount, by fund, ex-
pense class, and program, with the Legislative Services Office prior to pro-
cessing the reappropriation authorized herein.
SECTION 17. REAPPROPRIATION AUTHORITY FOR THE IDAHO CAREER READY STU-
DENTS PROGRAM FUND -- DEPARTMENT OF EDUCATION. There is hereby reappropri-
ated to the State Department of Education any unexpended and unencumbered
balances appropriated or reappropriated to the State Department of Educa-
tion from the Idaho Career Ready Students Program Fund for fiscal year 2026,
in an amount not to exceed $39,000,000, to be used for nonrecurring expendi-
tures related to the Idaho Career Ready Students Program for the period July
1, 2026, through June 30, 2027. The Office of the State Controller shall con-
firm the reappropriation amount, by fund, expense class, and program, with
the Legislative Services Office prior to processing the reappropriation au-
thorized herein.
SECTION 18. STANDARDS REVIEW AND ADOPTION PROGRAMS -- DEPARTMENT OF ED-
UCATION. Notwithstanding the provisions of Section 49-308, Idaho Code, and
any other provision of law to the contrary, of the amounts appropriated in
Section 1 of this act and any other appropriation provided by law from the
Driver's Training Fund, no more than $150,000 shall be used for standards re-
view and adoption programs.
SECTION 19. DATA SHARING -- DEPARTMENT OF EDUCATION. The State Depart-
ment of Education and the Office of the State Board of Education shall part-
ner to provide a monthly data file to the Budget and Policy Analysis Division
of the Legislative Services Office using data stored in the Idaho System for


Educational Excellence. Each data file shall be provided no later than the
tenth day of each month in an electronic spreadsheet format that allows for
analysis, formulas, and report building. The final format and content of the
data file shall be determined by the Budget and Policy Analysis Division of
the Legislative Services Office. Data that could identify a student's spe-
cial status or that is protected for privacy concerns shall be omitted, and
an alternative data point should be provided when possible.
SECTION 20. ACCOUNTABILITY REPORTS. Funds specifically identified in
statute or in an appropriation act as intended for a certain purpose may
be used only for that purpose. Funds provided in this act are subject to
accountability reports and management reviews in accordance with Section
67-702, Idaho Code, provided the Legislative Services Office auditor has
sufficient resources to conduct those reports. State agencies that are
authorized to contract for outside audits shall submit those reports to the
Joint Finance-Appropriations Committee when those reports become avail-
able.
SECTION 21. CONDITIONS, LIMITATIONS, AND RESTRICTIONS. Appropriations
made pursuant to this act are subject to the conditions, limitations, and re-
strictions specified in this act.
SECTION 22. An emergency existing therefor, which emergency is hereby
declared to exist, this act shall be in full force and effect on and after
July 1, 2026.